Hawaii statutes.
§190D-32 Rules. The board may adopt
such rules as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. The adoption of these rules shall be in accordance
with chapter 91. [L 1986, c 91, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 176, §§8, 11; am L 2002,
c 203, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next